Virginia statutes. Title 8.9A. Commercial Code — Secured Transactions.
Applicability of Title.

§ 8.9A-109.
Scope.

General scope of title. Except as otherwise provided in subsections (c) and (d), this title applies to:

a transaction, regardless of its form, that creates a security interest in personal property or fixtures by contract;

an agricultural lien;

a sale of accounts, chattel paper, payment intangibles, or promissory notes;

a consignment;

a security interest arising under §§

8.2-401

,

8.2-505

,

8.2-711 (3)

, or §

8.2A-508 (5)

, as provided in §

8.9A-110

; and

a security interest arising under §

8.4-210

or §

8.5A-118

.

Security interest in secured obligation. The application of this title to a security interest in a secured obligation is not affected by the fact that the obligation is itself secured by a transaction or interest to which this title does not apply.

Extent to which title does not apply. This title does not apply to the extent that:

a statute, regulation, or treaty of the United States preempts this title;

another statute of this Commonwealth expressly governs the creation, perfection, priority, or enforcement of a security interest created by this Commonwealth or a governmental unit of this Commonwealth;

a statute of another state, a foreign country, or a governmental unit of another state or a foreign country, other than a statute generally applicable to security interests, expressly governs creation, perfection, priority, or enforcement of a security interest created by the state, country, or governmental unit; or

the rights of a transferee beneficiary or nominated person under a letter of credit are independent and superior under §

8.5A-114

.

Inapplicability of title. This title does not apply to:

a landlord’s lien, other than an agricultural lien;

a lien, other than an agricultural lien, given by statute or other rule of law for services or materials, but §

8.9A-333

applies with respect to priority of the lien;

an assignment of a claim for wages, salary, or other compensation of an employee;

a sale of accounts, chattel paper, payment intangibles, or promissory notes as part of a sale of the business out of which they arose;

an assignment of accounts, chattel paper, payment intangibles, or promissory notes which is for the purpose of collection only;

an assignment of a right to payment under a contract to an assignee that is also obligated to perform under the contract;

an assignment of a single account, payment intangible, or promissory note to an assignee in full or partial satisfaction of a preexisting indebtedness;

a transfer of an interest in or an assignment of a claim under a policy of insurance or contract for an annuity including a variable, other than an assignment by or to a health-care provider of a health-care-insurance receivable and any subsequent assignment of the right to payment, but §§

8.9A-315

and

8.9A-322

apply with respect to proceeds and priorities in proceeds;

an assignment of a right represented by a judgment, other than a judgment taken on a right to payment that was collateral;

a right of recoupment or set-off, but:

§

8.9A-340

applies with respect to the effectiveness of rights of recoupment or set-off against deposit accounts; and

§

8.9A-404

applies with respect to defenses or claims of an account debtor;

the creation or transfer of an interest in or lien on real property, including a lease or rents thereunder, except to the extent that provision is made for:

liens on real property in §§

8.9A-203

and

8.9A-308

;

fixtures in §

8.9A-334

;

fixture filings in §§

8.9A-501

,

8.9A-502

,

8.9A-512

,

8.9A-516

, and

8.9A-519

; and

security agreements covering personal and real property in §

8.9A-604

;

an assignment of a claim arising in tort, other than a commercial tort claim, but §§

8.9A-315

and

8.9A-322

apply with respect to proceeds and priorities in proceeds;

an assignment of a deposit account in a consumer transaction, but §§ 8.9A-315 and 8.9A-322 apply with respect to proceeds and priorities in proceeds;

a sale of promissory notes by the Commonwealth or a governmental unit of the Commonwealth in connection with or in furtherance of the exercise of the borrowing power of the Commonwealth or a governmental unit of the Commonwealth.

Except as provided below, the creation, perfection, priority and enforcement of a security interest, lien or pledge created, made or granted by the Commonwealth or a governmental unit of the Commonwealth to pay or secure any bonds, notes, obligations or other debt securities issued thereby shall be governed by §

2.2-4902.1

and this title shall not apply to such a security interest, lien or pledge. Security interests, liens or pledges created by the Commonwealth or a governmental unit of this Commonwealth in goods or software, or the proceeds thereof, shall be governed by this title.

History.

1964, c. 219, §§ 8.9-102, 8.9-104; 1973, c. 509; 1974, c. 190; 1997, c. 343; 2000, c. 1007; 2001, cc. 289, 296.

The 2001 amendments.

The 2001 amendments by cc. 289 and 296 are identical, and added subsection (d)(14) and subsection (e).

Law Review.

For survey on commercial law in Virginia for 1989, see 23 U. Rich. L. Rev. 523 (1989).

For note on the buyer in the ordinary course of business and on section 1403 of the Federal Aviation Act, see 36 Wash. & Lee L. Rev. 205 (1979).

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

2A M.J. Assignments, § 9; 3C M.J. Commercial Law, § 99.

§ 8.9A-110.
Security interests arising under Title 8.2 or Title 8.2A.

A security interest arising under §§

8.2-401

,

8.2-505

,

8.2-711 (3)

, or §

8.2A-508 (5)

is subject to this title. However, until the debtor obtains possession of the goods:

the security interest is enforceable, even if subdivision (b) (3) of §

8.9A-203

has not been satisfied;

filing is not required to perfect the security interest;

the rights of the secured party after default by the debtor are governed by Title 8.2 or Title 8.2A; and

the security interest has priority over a conflicting security interest created by the debtor.

History.

1964, c. 219, § 8.9-113; 1991, c. 536; 2000, c. 1007.

Law Review.

For comment on cumulative remedies under article 9 of the U.C.C., see 14 Wm. & Mary L. Rev. 213 (1972).

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

3C M.J. Commercial Law, §§ 3, 5, 20, 97.1, 99.